Montana, session 2025, LC2790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 87-6-107, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-6-107. Unlawful harassment of game animals and game birds animals with vehicle or
device. (1) A person may not concentrate, drive, rally, stir up, run, molest, flush, herd, chase, harass, or
impede the movement of or attempt to concentrate, drive, rally, stir up, run, molest, flush, herd, chase, harass,
or impede the movement of a game animal or game bird an animal from or with the use or aid of a self-
propelled, motor-driven, or drawn vehicle or device, including aircraft. This section does not apply to
landowners and their authorized agents engaged in the immediate protection of that landowner's property
herding, driving, corralling, or controlling their livestock.
(2) The following penalties apply for a violation of this section:
(a) A person convicted of or who forfeits bond or bail after being charged with a violation of this
section shall be fined not less than $50 or more than $1,000 or be imprisoned in the county detention center for
not more than 6 months, or both. In addition, the person may be subject to forfeiture of any current hunting,
fishing, or trapping license issued by this state and the privilege to hunt, fish, and trap in this state or to use
state lands, as defined in 77-1-101, for recreational purposes for a period of time set by the court.
(b) A person convicted of or who forfeits bond or bail after being charged with a second or
subsequent violation of this section within 5 years shall be fined not less than $500 or more than $1,000 or be
imprisoned for not more than 6 months, or both. In addition, the person shall forfeit any current hunting, fishing,
or trapping license issued by this state and the privilege to hunt, fish, and trap in this state for 24 months from
the date of conviction or forfeiture of bond or bail unless the court imposes a longer period."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****